Missouri, session 2026, SB1486.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 49, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 49.710, to read as
follows:
49.710. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Costs of demolition", costs incurred for any
operation by which a public facility is wrecked, razed,
rendered, moved, or removed by means of any tools,
equipment, or discharge of explosives. "Costs of
demolition" shall include any costs incurred for the removal
of all infrastructure including roads, sewers, or any other
similar infrastructure, as well as the costs of any required
environmental cleanup associated with the demolition;
(2) "Public facility", any building or facility owned
by:
(a) A county, a municipality, or a city not within a
county; or
(b) Any authority, board, commission, or other
political subdivision created by or pursuant to state law

SB 1486 2
for the purpose of owning or operating public facilities on
behalf of one or more counties or municipalities.
2. Any lessee of a public facility located in this
state with a capacity of sixty thousand people or more, at
which one or more professional sports teams plays its home
games, shall be liable for the reasonable costs of
demolition of such public facility if, upon termination or
expiration of the lease, the public facility is left in a
condition that is not reasonably adaptable or usable for
another lawful public or commercial use.
✓